Hawaii statutes.
§462A-3 Powers and duties of the director.
In addition to any other powers and duties authorized by law, the director
shall:

(1) Grant licenses to port pilots and deputy port
pilots pursuant to this chapter, when the need arises;

(2) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules in accordance with
chapter 91 as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter which
are to provide for maximum efficiency in navigating vessels entering or leaving
the waters of this State; maintain a pilotage system devoted to the
preservation, and protection of lives, property, and vessels entering or
leaving waters of the State; and ensure an adequate supply of qualified pilots
in aid of commerce and navigation;

(3) Develop appropriate standards for licensure and
renewal of licensure to maintain an adequate supply of pilots based on the
needs of users of pilotage services or the department of transportation's
harbors division. Licensing requirements shall include examinations and
investigations to determine whether persons applying for full port pilot, or
deputy port pilot licenses are qualified;

(4) Enforce this chapter and rules adopted pursuant
thereto;

(5) Suspend, revoke or deny the issuance of any
license for any cause prescribed by this chapter, or for any violation of the
rules;

(6) Investigate any person for violations of any
provisions of this chapter;

(7) Adopt methods to improve disciplinary and
enforcement programs against violations of this chapter; and

(8) Do all things reasonable, necessary, and
expedient to insure proper and safe pilotage and to facilitate the efficient
administration of this chapter. [L 1978, c 231, pt of §2; am L 1983, c 8, §1;
am L 1985, c 126, §3; am L 1988, c 131, §1; am L 1992, c 202, §144; am L 2001,
c 13, §3; am L 2015, c 48, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next